Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.20, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. General community education revenue. The general community education revenue for a district equals deleted text begin $5.42 for fiscal year 2007 through fiscal year 2024 anddeleted text end $6.35 for fiscal year 2025 and later, times the greater of 1,335 or the population of the district. The population of the district is determined according to section 275.14. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.20, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Youth after-school enrichment revenue. deleted text begin In fiscal year 2003 and thereafter,deleted text end Youth after-school enrichment revenue for a district operating a youth after-school enrichment program under section 124D.19, subdivision 12, equals: (1) $1.85 times the greater of 1,335 or the population of the district, as defined in section 275.14, not to exceed 10,000; and (2) $0.43 times the population of the district, as defined in section 275.14, in excess of 10,000. Youth after-school enrichment revenue must be reserved for youth after-school enrichment programs. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.20, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Total community education levy. To obtain total community education revenue, a district may levy the amount raised by a maximum tax rate of deleted text begin 0.94 percent through fiscal year 2024,deleted text end 0.375 percent in fiscal year 2025, 0.3298 percent in fiscal year 2026, and 0.3128 percent in fiscal year 2027 and later, times the adjusted net tax capacity of the district. If the amount of the total community education levy would exceed the total community education revenue, the total community education levy shall be determined according to subdivision 6.